Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 41 ORGANIZATION AND POWERS
11-41-123. Directors and meetings.

The corporate powers shall be exercised by a board of directors, which may be any number not less than five as shall be fixed by and stated in the articles of incorporation and which directors shall hold office until their successors are duly elected and qualified. At each annual meeting, the successors to the directors whose terms of office then expire shall be elected by the members entitled to vote at such time and place as shall be directed by the articles or bylaws of the association.

Public notice of the time and place of holding such elections, and also of all special meetings of the members, shall be published at least once, not more than thirty days nor less than ten days prior to the date fixed for said meeting, in a newspaper of general circulation printed in the county where the principal office of said corporation is located, and, if there is no such newspaper, then in a newspaper printed in an adjoining county, and, with respect to any special meeting or any annual meeting to be held at a time or place other than as specified in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the association, by delivering personally to each member or depositing in the post office at least thirty days before such meeting a copy of said notice, addressed to each member entitled to vote thereat, with the signature of the president or secretary printed thereon, stating the time and, in case of special meetings, the objects of said meeting; and no business shall be transacted at any special meeting except such as shall be mentioned in said notice; if any member fails to furnish the secretary with his correct post-office address, he shall not be entitled to separate notice.

Whenever any notice is required to be given under the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title or under the provisions of the articles or bylaws of any association organized under the laws of Colorado, a waiver thereof in writing signed by the persons entitled to said notice, whether before, at, or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to such notice.

Members who are entitled to vote may vote either in person or by proxy at such meetings. Any number of members present in person or by proxy at a regular or special meeting of the members shall constitute a quorum unless otherwise specifically provided in articles 40 to 46 of this title. If a majority of the votes represented at any annual or special meeting are in favor of adjournment, such meeting may be adjourned for a period not to exceed sixty days at one adjournment. Each member entitled to vote shall be permitted to cast, in person or by proxy, one vote for each one hundred dollars, or fraction thereof, of the total certificate value of all his shares and stock. A borrowing member holding a membership certificate shall be permitted, as a borrower, to cast one vote and has such voting right in all cases where articles 40 to 46 of this title give such right to shareholders.

A majority of all votes cast at any meeting of members shall determine any question unless otherwise specifically provided. The members who are entitled to vote at any meeting of the members shall be those of record on the books of the association at the end of the calendar month next preceding the date of the meeting of members, except those who have ceased to be members. In balloting for directors, members may vote for as many directors as are to be elected, or, in case the certificate of incorporation of the association permits cumulative voting, each member may cumulate his votes and give one candidate as many votes as the number of directors multiplied by the number of his votes or distribute them on the same principle among as many candidates as he may desire; and the person having the highest number of votes in consecutive order shall be declared elected. By the unanimous vote of all the members represented at such meeting, the secretary of the meeting may be authorized and instructed to cast one ballot for one or more of all the directors to be elected.

When any vacancy occurs among the directors by death, resignation, or otherwise, it shall be filled for the remainder of the year by a majority vote of the remaining directors, unless otherwise provided by the bylaws of said association.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 307, § 14.

CSA:

C. 25, § 17.

L. 39:

p. 243, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-23.

L. 69:

p. 1016, § 10.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 379, § 6, effective May 11.

11-41-124. Officers or directors to receive no commission.

No officer or director of any savings and loan association shall take or receive for himself, directly or indirectly, any commission, compensation, remuneration, gift, speculative interest, or other thing of value as an inducement to the making of any loan by the association or the purchase of any securities for the association or for the sale of any of the stock of the association.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 354, § 6.

CSA:

C. 25, § 74.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-24.

11-41-125. Loans to officers and directors.

No officer or director of any savings and loan association shall negotiate for or receive a mortgage loan from such association, except for the bona fide financing of the home of such officer or director, unless the commissioner has first approved such loan.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 358, § 16.

CSA:

C. 25, § 84.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-25.

L. 55:

p. 761, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-25.

11-41-126. Bonds of officers.

Every officer, employee, and agent handling or having custody or charge of funds or securities belonging to a savings and loan association, before entering upon the discharge of his duties, shall give a good and sufficient bond in such sum as may be fixed by the board of directors of any such association. Such bond shall be in such form and provide such coverage as the commissioner may direct and shall be made by a surety corporation authorized to do business in this state. The amount of such bond as to each person shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner. In lieu of individual bonds, a blanket bond covering all active officers, agents, and employees of such association may be executed, subject to approval by the commissioner. Every such bond shall be in force until ten days after notice to such commissioner that the same is to be canceled.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 362, § 22.

CSA:

C. 25, § 90.

L. 39:

p. 255, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-26.

11-41-127. Violations - penalties.

Any officer, director, agent, or employee of any savings and loan association who, directly or indirectly or by indirection, commits or causes the commission of theft, abstraction, or misapplication of any of the funds or securities or other property of or under the control of any savings and loan association, with intent to deceive, injure, cheat, wrong, or defraud any person, commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates section 11-41-103 and sections 11-41-124 to 11-41-126 commits a petty offense, and each such violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 362, § 23.

CSA:

C. 25, § 91.

L. 39:

p. 256, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-27.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 871, § 26, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 822, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1471, § 39, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3150, § 124, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 574 (1980).

Cross references:

(1) For the penalty for a petty offense, see § 18-1.3-503.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

11-41-128. Acknowledgments.

No notary public or other public officer qualified to take acknowledgments or proof of written instruments shall be disqualified from taking the acknowledgment or proof of an instrument in writing in which a savings and loan association is interested by reason of his employment by or his being a member or officer of the savings and loan association interested in such instrument.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 353, § 5.

CSA:

C. 25, § 73.

L. 51:

p. 216, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-28.

11-41-129. Amendment of articles of incorporation.

Except as provided in section 11-41-130.5, if the holders of at least one-third of the outstanding voting stock or shares of any association request, in writing, the president or other head officer thereof to call a meeting of stockholders or shareholders of such association for the purpose of considering a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation of such association, setting forth in such written request the substance of each proposed amendment, or if the board of directors of any association votes to submit to the stockholders or shareholders thereof a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation of such association, the president or secretary of the association forthwith shall call a special meeting of the voting stockholders or shareholders of such association for the purpose of considering said proposed amendment for a time not less than thirty nor more than sixty days thereafter. In the event that the request for a meeting of stockholders or shareholders to consider a proposed amendment of the articles of incorporation is presented within ninety days prior to the date of the next annual meeting of the stockholders or shareholders of the association or in the event that the amendment is proposed by the board of directors of the association, the board of directors may cause such proposed amendment to be submitted for consideration at such next annual meeting, or at an adjourned session thereof, rather than at a special meeting of stockholders or shareholders called for such purpose.

If at any such meeting the proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation of such association receives the affirmative vote of the majority, but in the case of associations having stock issued pursuant to section 11-42-107 two-thirds, or such greater amount as may be required by the articles of incorporation, or any amendment thereto, of the stock or shares of each class outstanding having voting power, such amendment shall be deemed adopted; but, where necessary for any association to increase its authorized permanent stock to conform to the requirements of said section 11-42-107, the affirmative vote of a majority of such stock or shares shall be required.

If any proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation would alter or change the preference given to any one or more classes of shares or stock or would convert the stock into shares or shares into stock, the holders of each class of stock or shares so affected by said amendment shall be entitled to vote as a class upon such amendment, whether by the terms of the articles of incorporation such class is entitled to vote or not, and the affirmative vote of the holders of the majority, but in the case of associations having stock issued pursuant to section 11-42-107 two-thirds, of the amount of each class of stock or shares outstanding so affected by the amendment shall be necessary to the adoption thereof, as well as the affirmative vote of the holders of the majority, but in the case of associations having stock issued pursuant to section 11-42-107 two-thirds, of all classes of stock or shares outstanding having voting power.

A certificate setting forth such amendment and the adoption thereof, signed by the president or vice-president of such association, verified by his affidavit, and attested by the secretary or assistant secretary thereof, with the seal of the association thereunto affixed, shall be submitted together with the fee established by the commissioner to the commissioner for his approval or disapproval, and, if he approves, he shall cause a certificate of approval to be attached to said proposed amendment, and then the same shall be filed in the same manner as articles of incorporation, and thereafter said amendment shall be in full force and effect to the same extent, except as provided in section 11-41-130.5, as if the same had been included in the original articles of incorporation. No amendment to the articles of incorporation shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state of the state of Colorado or received by the secretary of state unless a certificate of approval by the commissioner is attached thereto.

Except as provided in section 11-41-130.5, any association organized under the laws of this state, from time to time, may amend its articles of incorporation by increasing or decreasing its authorized stock or shares or reclassifying the same, or by changing the number, designation, preference, relation, or participating or other special rights of shares or stock or the qualifications, limitations, or restrictions of such rights, or by changing its corporate title, or by making any other change or alteration in its articles of incorporation that may be desired, if such articles of incorporation, as so amended, contain only such provisions as it would be lawful and proper to insert in original articles of incorporation made at the time of making such amendment. Except as provided in section 11-41-130.5, no association by any amendment shall so change its articles of incorporation as to work a change in the objects or purposes for which the association was originally organized.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 310, § 15.

CSA:

C. 25, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-29.

L. 65:

p. 971, § 1.

L. 69:

p. 1017, § 11.

L. 84:

(1), (4), and (5) amended, p. 379, § 7, effective May 11.

11-41-130. Reorganization.

The board of directors of any association, at a meeting called for that purpose, may adopt a plan of reorganization of the association. Two copies of the proposed plan of reorganization, signed by the president or vice-president of such association, verified by his affidavit, and attested by the secretary or assistant secretary thereof, with the seal of the association thereunto affixed, shall be submitted to the commissioner for his approval or disapproval, and he shall cause a certificate of approval or disapproval to be attached to said proposed plan, one copy to be filed in the division and one returned to the association. If approved by the commissioner, such approved plan shall be presented to the members at a special meeting called for the purpose of considering and voting upon such approved plan. The complete plan of reorganization, as adopted by the board of directors and approved by the commissioner, shall be furnished each member at the time notice of such meeting, as required by section 11-41-123, is given. If at such meeting two-thirds of all votes of the members present in person or by proxy are in favor of such approved plan, the association may proceed to reorganize in accordance therewith.

The proceedings of such meeting shall be submitted to the commissioner for his approval in the same manner as required for the submission of the plan by the board of directors. Unless the plan of reorganization fixes a later effective date thereof, the effective date of reorganization shall be the date upon which the commissioner accepts for filing the certified copies of the proceedings of the meetings of members adopting the approved plan of reorganization.

The privilege of reorganization is likewise extended to savings and loan associations which are in the course of voluntary or involuntary liquidation.

In order that equity may be done for all members of such association in the event of reorganization, all pending withdrawal applications shall be canceled.

In addition to all other lawful provisions, the plan may provide for the exchange of shares or stock or both in the association for shares or stock or both of the same or a different class of the reorganized association. Without limiting the methods by which an association may reorganize, any association may:

Provide for reorganization under the existing name of the association or under a different name;

Provide for segregation by division, on the records of the association or on the records of any reorganized association, of any part of its assets and liabilities, including division of the certificate value of the shares or stock or both, and of any reserves created to absorb losses;

Provide for segregation by division, between the association and a reorganized association or between two reorganized associations, of any part of its assets and liabilities, including division of the certificate value of the shares or stock or both and of any reserves created to absorb losses;

Fix the time prior to which notice of withdrawal of such shares so issued in exchange for shares in the associations being reorganized shall not be given.

The reorganization of such association shall not prejudice the right of any creditor of any such association to have payment of his debt out of the assets and property thereof, nor shall any creditor be thereby deprived of or prejudiced in any right of action then existing against the officers or directors of said association for any neglect or misconduct. All obligations to any such prior association shall inure to the benefit of the reorganized association and shall be enforceable by it and in its name, and demands, claims, and rights of action against any such association may be enforced against it as fully and completely as they might have been enforced theretofore; and all deeds, notes, mortgages, contracts, judgments, transactions, and proceedings whatsoever theretofore made, received, entered into, carried on, or done by such association before such reorganization shall be as good, valid, and effectual in law as though such association had never been reorganized.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 365, § 28.

CSA:

C. 25, § 96.

L. 39:

p. 258, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-30.

11-41-130.5. Cessation of business as an association - amendment of articles.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, in connection with the sale of all or a substantial part of its assets, the board of directors of any savings and loan association may propose an amendment to its articles of incorporation to amend the objects and purposes to conform to those authorized in the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of title 7, C.R.S., and to make such other amendments authorized by and not inconsistent with the provisions of article 110 of title 7, C.R.S. Such proposed amendments shall be submitted to the members or, if the savings and loan association has permanent stock, to the stockholders of said association for their approval. Upon approval, said amendments shall be submitted to the commissioner, together with a plan pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, for his approval.

The amendments to a savings and loan association's articles of incorporation shall be accompanied by a plan for the cessation of the conduct of a savings and loan association in the state.

The commissioner shall approve a plan only if:

He determines that an association has paid or has made provision through an assumption agreement or otherwise for its known and unclaimed liabilities to its depositors and account holders;

The amended articles of incorporation delete the words "savings and loan association"; and

The amended articles of incorporation expressly prohibit the conduct of a savings and loan or banking business in Colorado by the corporation.

In approving a plan, the commissioner may impose such terms and conditions as he deems necessary to protect the depositors, account holders, stockholders, members, and creditors of the savings and loan association.

Upon approval of a plan and the amendments to the articles of incorporation by the commissioner pursuant to this article and upon the filing of such amendments, along with the applicable filing fees with the secretary of state as provided by section 11-41-129 (4), a corporation shall continue in existence pursuant to the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of title 7, C.R.S., but said corporation shall cease to be a savings and loan association or an association. The corporation's certificate of authority as a savings and loan association or an association shall automatically be canceled, without further action, and the corporation shall be deemed to be organized pursuant to the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of title 7, C.R.S., and shall cease to be subject to the provisions of the "Savings and Loan Association Law", articles 40 to 46 of this title.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 380, § 8, effective May 11.

L. 93:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 861, § 29, effective July 1, 1994.

11-41-131. Dissolution.

Any domestic association may elect to abandon its certificate of authority, liquidate its affairs, and dissolve as provided in this section. The affirmative vote of at least a majority of the directors must be cast in favor of such proposal at a special meeting thereof. A certified copy of such action shall be furnished to the commissioner, who shall forthwith examine said association, and, if he determines that such association is solvent and that it is to the best interests of the members that such liquidation be accomplished in the manner provided in this section, he shall certify his approval thereto. Upon the granting of such approval, a special meeting of all members entitled to vote shall be called in the manner provided by section 11-41-123. If a majority vote of all such members of the association is cast in favor of the proposal to liquidate and ultimately dissolve such association under the provisions of this section, such proposal shall be deemed adopted. A certified copy of all proceedings taken prior to and at such meeting shall be filed with the commissioner, who shall determine whether or not such proceedings have been conducted in accordance with law. If the commissioner finds that such proceedings are legal and proper, he shall certify his approval thereon and authorize said association to proceed with the liquidation in the manner provided in this section.

The board of directors shall act as trustees for liquidation, and shall proceed as speedily as may be practical to wind up the affairs of the association, and, to the extent necessary, shall exercise all the powers granted by articles 40 to 46 of this title to active associations and to the commissioner in the case of departmental liquidation, and, without prejudice to the generality of such authority, may carry out executory contracts, enter into new contracts, borrow money, mortgage or pledge property, sell assets at public or private sale, make and receive conveyances in the corporate name, lease real estate, settle or compromise claims, commence and prosecute all actions and proceedings necessary to enable liquidation, distribute assets either in cash or in kind among members according to their respective rights, after paying or adequately providing for the payment of liabilities, and do and perform all acts necessary or expedient to the winding up of the association. The board of directors has power to exchange or otherwise dispose of or place in trust all or any part of the assets upon such terms and conditions and for such considerations as may be deemed reasonable or expedient and may distribute such considerations among the members in proportion to their interest therein. In the absence of fraud, any determination of value made by said board of directors for any such purpose shall be conclusive.

The association, during the liquidation of the assets of the association, shall be subject to the supervision of the commissioner, and shall pay such fees and assessments as are provided for in articles 40 to 46 of this title in the case of active associations and shall report the progress of such liquidation to the commissioner as he may require. Upon completion of liquidation, a final report and accounting of the affairs of the association shall be made to the commissioner. Upon the approval of such report by the commissioner, the board of directors, without the necessity of further action by the members of the association, shall proceed to dissolve such association in the manner provided by law in the case of general corporations.

Nothing in this section shall prejudice the rights of the commissioner to take possession of any association, under the authority vested in him by the provisions of section 11-44-110, upon determining that such procedure is to the best interest of the members.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 260, § 35.

CSA:

C. 25, § 98.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-31.

11-41-132. Escheat proceedings.

If the affairs of an association have been voluntarily liquidated as provided in articles 40 to 46 of this title and any liquidating dividends remain unclaimed after the approval of the final report of liquidation, the trustees for liquidation may transfer such unclaimed liquidating dividends to the commissioner. In case of such transfer or in case an association has been liquidated by the commissioner and any liquidating dividends remain unclaimed six years after the approval of the final report of such liquidation, the commissioner may elect to pay such unclaimed liquidating dividends to the state treasurer.

Due notice of such election shall be given by publication once a week for four successive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation in the county in this state where the last principal place of business of such association was located. Within fifteen days after the first publication, the commissioner shall mail a copy of the notice to each person whose liquidating dividends are to be paid to the state treasurer at the last address appearing on the books of the association.

After thirty days from the date of the last publication, the commissioner shall pay to the state treasurer any such liquidating dividends in his possession, less the costs of publication and mailing, and shall file with the state treasurer the affidavit of publication by the publisher and the affidavit of mailing by the commissioner, showing the dates of such publications and mailing. The state shall be answerable for such funds, without interest, anytime within twenty-one years after the same have been paid into the treasury, to such persons as shall be legally entitled thereto. After the lapse of twenty-one years from the time any such moneys have been paid into the state treasury, no claim therefor having been made and established by any person entitled thereto, said moneys shall become the property of the state and shall be transferred to the general fund.

Payment to the state treasurer shall discharge the commissioner from any further liability or responsibility for such moneys.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 216, § 5.

CSA:

C. 25, § 99.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-32.

11-41-133. Acquisition of majority control over an existing association - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Entity" means a person or group of persons.

"Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, trust, or similar organization.

An entity shall be deemed "to have control" of an association if said entity:

Directly or indirectly, or acting in concert with one or more persons, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing more than twenty-five percent of the permanent stock of such association;

Controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of such association; or

Exercises a controlling influence over the management or policies of such association.

Whenever an entity proposes to take an action or conduct an activity which would cause such entity to have control of that association, the entity shall first make application to the commissioner for a certificate of approval of such action or activity.

The application shall be in such form and provide such information as the commissioner may require by rule or regulation and shall be accompanied when submitted by a nonrefundable filing fee in the amount established by the commissioner.

After receipt of an application, the commissioner shall make an investigation and shall issue the certificate of approval only after he has determined:

That the controlling entity is qualified by character, experience, and financial responsibility to control the association in a legal and proper manner; and

That the interests of the public generally will not be jeopardized by the proposed action or activity causing the entity to have control of the association.

This section shall not apply to the acquisition of:

Directors' voting proxies acquired in the normal course of business as a result of a proxy solicitation in conjunction with a stockholders' meeting;

Stock held in a fiduciary capacity unless the acquiring person has sole discretionary authority to exercise voting rights with respect thereto;

Stock acquired in securing or collecting a debt contracted in good faith; except that it shall apply two years after the date of acquisition; or

Stock acquired by an underwriter in good faith and without any intent to evade the purpose of this section if the shares are held only for such reasonable period of time as will permit the sale thereof.

When the commissioner has not acted upon a completed application within sixty days of receipt thereof, it shall be considered approved.

A domestic association may, subject to any applicable regulations of the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, invest in an association that is domiciled or conducts its principal operations in another state and acquire control of such association, and notwithstanding any other provision of articles 40 to 46 of this title to the contrary, if the entity proposing to acquire control of a domestic association is a foreign association, the foreign association shall, in addition to submitting all information pertinent to the evaluation of the application under this section that the commissioner may require together with all applicable fees, meet the following criteria:

The foreign association seeking the acquisition shall have deposits that it may hold insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor in accordance with the provisions of section

11-41-117

; and

The foreign association shall be in compliance with the capital requirements specified in this subparagraph (II) as follows:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 150, § 57, effective July 1, 2004.)

On and after January 1, 1993, the foreign association shall have a ratio of total capital to total assets of not less than six percent or the prevailing regulatory capital requirements established by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, whichever is greater; and

(II.5) Once a capital threshold is established in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) it shall be the prevailing standard for purposes of this section to be applied by the commissioner regardless of any reduction below the prevailing regulatory capital threshold requirement unless the general assembly authorizes the application of a lower standard; and

The commissioner shall not approve any application for acquisition under this subsection (6) if such acquisition would result in the foreign association controlling at the time of the acquisition more than twenty-five percent of the aggregate of all deposits in all banks, savings and loan associations, federal savings banks, and other financial institutions located in Colorado, which are federally insured. For the purposes of this subsection (6), deposits shall be determined based upon the public reports most recently filed with the appropriate federal regulatory agency; and

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (6), the foreign association shall be domiciled or conduct its principal operations in a state which is both contiguous to Colorado and which also has laws that allow a domestic association to establish business operations in that state under conditions which are determined by the commissioner to be not more restrictive than those provided in articles 40 to 46 of this title. For the purpose of this subsection (6), the place where an association "conducts its principal operations" means the place where the largest percentage of the aggregate deposits of the foreign association and all of its subsidiaries are held.

On or after January 1, 1991, a foreign association seeking to acquire control of a domestic association may be domiciled or have its principal offices in any state without regard to its proximity to this state and without regard to the statutory conditions required by subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (6).

Whenever a foreign association which meets the criteria established by this subsection (6) proposes to acquire control of a domestic association, the foreign association shall make an application for prior approval to the commissioner in such form and with such information that the commissioner shall require, and such application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable filing fee in such amount as determined by the commissioner. Upon receipt of a properly submitted application to acquire control of a domestic association, the commissioner shall proceed to investigate the application in accordance with the provisions of this section. The commissioner shall not grant approval of the merger until he is satisfied that the criteria imposed by this section have been met and that the acquisition is not contrary to the public interest.

No foreign association may acquire control of a domestic association except in accordance with the provisions of this section, and no such acquisition shall be completed without a certificate of approval issued by the commissioner.

A domestic association which is acquired in accordance with the provisions of this section may continue to operate as a domestic association subject to the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title. Any officer of a foreign association that acquires a domestic association pursuant to this section whose primary duty is managing the day-to-day operations of the Colorado offices of such foreign association shall be a resident of Colorado.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 489, § 2, effective April 26.

L. 84:

(2)(b) amended, p. 381, § 9, effective May 11.

L. 88:

(6) added, p. 459, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(2)(a), (3)(a), and (3)(b) amended, p. 611, § 5, effective April 19.

L. 2004:

IP(6)(a), (6)(a)(I), and (6)(a)(II)(A) to (6)(a)(II)(C) amended, p. 150, § 57, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

In 2000, subsection (6)(a)(II)(D), enacted in 1988, was renumbered as subsection (6)(a)(II.5) on revision.

11-41-134. Indemnification and personal liability of directors, officers, employees, and agents - legislative declaration.

The savings and loan association has the same powers, rights, and obligations and is subject to the same limitations as apply to corporations for profit as set forth in article 109 of title 7. Savings and loan association directors, officers, employees, and agents have the same rights as directors, officers, employees, and agents, respectively, of corporations for profit as set forth in article 109 of title 7. Savings and loan association directors and officers have the benefit of the same limitations on personal liability for any injury to person or property arising out of a tort as set forth in section 7-108-403, for directors and officers, respectively, of corporations for profit. Any reference in said sections to shareholders shall be construed to refer to stockholders for the purposes of this section.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the following is enforceable and in conformity with the public policy of this state, as expressed in articles 40 to 46 of this title:

Any insurance policy, form, contract, endorsement, or certificate in effect or issued on or after April 30, 1993, which provides insurance coverage to directors or officers, or both, of a savings and loan association but which does not grant coverage or which excludes coverage for claims made by any depository insurance organization or any other state or federal corporation, organization, or entity acting as receiver, conservator, or liquidator of such savings and loan association, whether in its own name or in behalf of any other person or entity; or

Any fidelity bond, financial institution bond, or depository institution bond in effect or issued on or after April 30, 1993, that provides for termination of such bond upon the taking over of the savings and loan association by a receiver or other liquidator or by state or federal officials.

No provision of articles 40 to 46 of this title shall be construed to contravene or modify the expressed public policy set forth in this subsection (2).

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 371, § 16, effective May 20.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 620, § 4, effective April 30; (1) amended, p. 862, § 30, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1965, § 68, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by House Bill 93-1154 and House Bill 93-1261 were harmonized.